Hawaii statutes.
§425-153 Statement of qualification.
A statement of qualification shall contain:

(1) The name of the partnership;

(2) A statement that the partnership elects to be a
limited liability partnership; and

(3) The mailing address of the partnership's initial
principal office and the information required by section 425R-4(a). [L 2000, c
218, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §73; am L 2002, c 130, §86; am L 2004, c 121,
§30; am L 2009, c 55, §35]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next